Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2831
Pharmaceutical care, defined.

(1) Pharmaceutical care means the provision of drug therapy by a pharmacist for the purpose of achieving therapeutic outcomes that improve a patient's quality of life. Such outcomes include (a) the cure of disease, (b) the elimination or reduction of a patient's symptomatology, (c) the arrest or slowing of a disease process, or (d) the prevention of a disease or symptomatology.

(2) Pharmaceutical care includes the process through which the pharmacist works in concert with the patient and his or her caregiver, physician, or other professionals in designing, implementing, and monitoring a therapeutic plan that will produce specific therapeutic outcomes for the patient.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 927;

Laws 2015, LB37, § 36.